Generated/uz.aff
FLAG long
# OT/KICHRAYTMA : CHA:TSH:MI?
SFX As Y 192
SFX As 0 chanimi .
SFX As 0 chanichi .
SFX As 0 chanidir .
SFX As 0 chanida .
SFX As 0 chaniku .
SFX As 0 chanimikan .
SFX As 0 chanimidi .
SFX As 0 chanidirda .
SFX As 0 chaningmi .
SFX As 0 chaningchi .
SFX As 0 chaningdir .
SFX As 0 chaningda .
SFX As 0 chaningku .
SFX As 0 chaningmikan .
SFX As 0 chaningmidi .
SFX As 0 chaningdirda .
SFX As 0 chadami .
SFX As 0 chadachi .
SFX As 0 chadadir .
SFX As 0 chadada .
SFX As 0 chadaku .
SFX As 0 chadamikan .
SFX As 0 chadamidi .
SFX As 0 chadadirda .
SFX As 0 chadanmi .
SFX As 0 chadanchi .
SFX As 0 chadandir .
SFX As 0 chadanda .
SFX As 0 chadanku .
SFX As 0 chadanmikan .
SFX As 0 chadanmidi .
SFX As 0 chadandirda .
SFX As 0 chadagimi .
SFX As 0 chadagichi .
SFX As 0 chadagidir .
SFX As 0 chadagida .
SFX As 0 chadagiku .
SFX As 0 chadagimikan .
SFX As 0 chadagimidi .
SFX As 0 chadagidirda .
SFX As 0 chadagidekmi .
SFX As 0 chadagidekchi .
SFX As 0 chadagidekdir .
SFX As 0 chadagidekda .
SFX As 0 chadagidekku .
SFX As 0 chadagidekmikan .
SFX As 0 chadagidekmidi .
SFX As 0 chadagidekdirda .
SFX As 0 chagami .
SFX As 0 chagachi .
SFX As 0 chagadir .
SFX As 0 chagada .
SFX As 0 chagaku .
SFX As 0 chagamikan .
SFX As 0 chagamidi .
SFX As 0 chagadirda .
SFX As 0 chagachami .
SFX As 0 chagachachi .
SFX As 0 chagachadir .
SFX As 0 chagachada .
SFX As 0 chagachaku .
SFX As 0 chagachamikan .
SFX As 0 chagachamidi .
SFX As 0 chagachadirda .
SFX As 0 deknimi .
SFX As 0 deknichi .
SFX As 0 deknidir .
SFX As 0 deknida .
SFX As 0 dekniku .
SFX As 0 deknimikan .
SFX As 0 deknimidi .
SFX As 0 deknidirda .
SFX As 0 dekningmi .
SFX As 0 dekningchi .
SFX As 0 dekningdir .
SFX As 0 dekningda .
SFX As 0 dekningku .
SFX As 0 dekningmikan .
SFX As 0 dekningmidi .
SFX As 0 dekningdirda .
SFX As 0 dekdami .
SFX As 0 dekdachi .
SFX As 0 dekdadir .
SFX As 0 dekdada .
SFX As 0 dekdaku .
SFX As 0 dekdamikan .
SFX As 0 dekdamidi .
SFX As 0 dekdadirda .
SFX As 0 dekdanmi .
SFX As 0 dekdanchi .
SFX As 0 dekdandir .
SFX As 0 dekdanda .
SFX As 0 dekdanku .
SFX As 0 dekdanmikan .
SFX As 0 dekdanmidi .
SFX As 0 dekdandirda .
SFX As 0 dekdagimi .
SFX As 0 dekdagichi .
SFX As 0 dekdagidir .
SFX As 0 dekdagida .
SFX As 0 dekdagiku .
SFX As 0 dekdagimikan .
SFX As 0 dekdagimidi .
SFX As 0 dekdagidirda .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekmi .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekchi .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekdir .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekda .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekku .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekmikan .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekmidi .
SFX As 0 dekdagidekdirda .
SFX As 0 dekkami .
SFX As 0 dekkachi .
SFX As 0 dekkadir .
SFX As 0 dekkada .
SFX As 0 dekkaku .
SFX As 0 dekkamikan .
SFX As 0 dekkamidi .
SFX As 0 dekkadirda .
SFX As 0 dekkachami .
SFX As 0 dekkachachi .
SFX As 0 dekkachadir .
SFX As 0 dekkachada .
SFX As 0 dekkachaku .
SFX As 0 dekkachamikan .
SFX As 0 dekkachamidi .
SFX As 0 dekkachadirda .
SFX As 0 simonnimi .
SFX As 0 simonnichi .
SFX As 0 simonnidir .
SFX As 0 simonnida .
SFX As 0 simonniku .
SFX As 0 simonnimikan .
SFX As 0 simonnimidi .
SFX As 0 simonnidirda .
SFX As 0 simonningmi .
SFX As 0 simonningchi .
SFX As 0 simonningdir .
SFX As 0 simonningda .
SFX As 0 simonningku .
SFX As 0 simonningmikan .
SFX As 0 simonningmidi .
SFX As 0 simonningdirda .
SFX As 0 simondami .
SFX As 0 simondachi .
SFX As 0 simondadir .
SFX As 0 simondada .
SFX As 0 simondaku .
SFX As 0 simondamikan .
SFX As 0 simondamidi .
SFX As 0 simondadirda .
SFX As 0 simondanmi .
SFX As 0 simondanchi .
SFX As 0 simondandir .
SFX As 0 simondanda .
SFX As 0 simondanku .
SFX As 0 simondanmikan .
SFX As 0 simondanmidi .
SFX As 0 simondandirda .
SFX As 0 simondagimi .
SFX As 0 simondagichi .
SFX As 0 simondagidir .
SFX As 0 simondagida .
SFX As 0 simondagiku .
SFX As 0 simondagimikan .
SFX As 0 simondagimidi .
SFX As 0 simondagidirda .
SFX As 0 simondagidekmi .
SFX As 0 simondagidekchi .
SFX As 0 simondagidekdir .
SFX As 0 simondagidekda .
SFX As 0 simondagidekku .
SFX As 0 simondagidekmikan .
SFX As 0 simondagidekmidi .
SFX As 0 simondagidekdirda .
SFX As 0 simongami .
SFX As 0 simongachi .
SFX As 0 simongadir .
SFX As 0 simongada .
SFX As 0 simongaku .
SFX As 0 simongamikan .
SFX As 0 simongamidi .
SFX As 0 simongadirda .
SFX As 0 simongachami .
SFX As 0 simongachachi .
SFX As 0 simongachadir .
SFX As 0 simongachada .
SFX As 0 simongachaku .
SFX As 0 simongachamikan .
SFX As 0 simongachamidi .
SFX As 0 simongachadirda .

# OT/KO'PLIK : LAR:TSH:MI?
SFX At Y 64
SFX At 0 larnimi .
SFX At 0 larnichi .
SFX At 0 larnidir .
SFX At 0 larnida .
SFX At 0 larniku .
SFX At 0 larnimikan .
SFX At 0 larnimidi .
SFX At 0 larnidirda .
SFX At 0 larningmi .
SFX At 0 larningchi .
SFX At 0 larningdir .
SFX At 0 larningda .
SFX At 0 larningku .
SFX At 0 larningmikan .
SFX At 0 larningmidi .
SFX At 0 larningdirda .
SFX At 0 lardami .
SFX At 0 lardachi .
SFX At 0 lardadir .
SFX At 0 lardada .
SFX At 0 lardaku .
SFX At 0 lardamikan .
SFX At 0 lardamidi .
SFX At 0 lardadirda .
SFX At 0 lardanmi .
SFX At 0 lardanchi .
SFX At 0 lardandir .
SFX At 0 lardanda .
SFX At 0 lardanku .
SFX At 0 lardanmikan .
SFX At 0 lardanmidi .
SFX At 0 lardandirda .
SFX At 0 lardagimi .
SFX At 0 lardagichi .
SFX At 0 lardagidir .
SFX At 0 lardagida .
SFX At 0 lardagiku .
SFX At 0 lardagimikan .
SFX At 0 lardagimidi .
SFX At 0 lardagidirda .
SFX At 0 lardagidekmi .
SFX At 0 lardagidekchi .
SFX At 0 lardagidekdir .
SFX At 0 lardagidekda .
SFX At 0 lardagidekku .
SFX At 0 lardagidekmikan .
SFX At 0 lardagidekmidi .
SFX At 0 lardagidekdirda .
SFX At 0 largami .
SFX At 0 largachi .
SFX At 0 largadir .
SFX At 0 largada .
SFX At 0 largaku .
SFX At 0 largamikan .
SFX At 0 largamidi .
SFX At 0 largadirda .
SFX At 0 largachami .
SFX At 0 largachachi .
SFX At 0 largachadir .
SFX At 0 largachada .
SFX At 0 largachaku .
SFX At 0 largachamikan .
SFX At 0 largachamidi .
SFX At 0 largachadirda .

# OT/KICHRAYTMA : CHA:LAR:TSH:MI?
SFX Au Y 192
SFX Au 0 chalarnimi .
SFX Au 0 chalarnichi .
SFX Au 0 chalarnidir .
SFX Au 0 chalarnida .
SFX Au 0 chalarniku .
SFX Au 0 chalarnimikan .
SFX Au 0 chalarnimidi .
SFX Au 0 chalarnidirda .
SFX Au 0 chalarningmi .
SFX Au 0 chalarningchi .
SFX Au 0 chalarningdir .
SFX Au 0 chalarningda .
SFX Au 0 chalarningku .
SFX Au 0 chalarningmikan .
SFX Au 0 chalarningmidi .
SFX Au 0 chalarningdirda .
SFX Au 0 chalardami .
SFX Au 0 chalardachi .
SFX Au 0 chalardadir .
SFX Au 0 chalardada .
SFX Au 0 chalardaku .
SFX Au 0 chalardamikan .
SFX Au 0 chalardamidi .
SFX Au 0 chalardadirda .
SFX Au 0 chalardanmi .
SFX Au 0 chalardanchi .
SFX Au 0 chalardandir .
SFX Au 0 chalardanda .
SFX Au 0 chalardanku .
SFX Au 0 chalardanmikan .
SFX Au 0 chalardanmidi .
SFX Au 0 chalardandirda .
SFX Au 0 chalardagimi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagichi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidir .
SFX Au 0 chalardagida .
SFX Au 0 chalardagiku .
SFX Au 0 chalardagimikan .
SFX Au 0 chalardagimidi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidirda .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekmi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekchi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekdir .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekda .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekku .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekmikan .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekmidi .
SFX Au 0 chalardagidekdirda .
SFX Au 0 chalargami .
SFX Au 0 chalargachi .
SFX Au 0 chalargadir .
SFX Au 0 chalargada .
SFX Au 0 chalargaku .
SFX Au 0 chalargamikan .
SFX Au 0 chalargamidi .
SFX Au 0 chalargadirda .
SFX Au 0 chalargachami .
SFX Au 0 chalargachachi .
SFX Au 0 chalargachadir .
SFX Au 0 chalargachada .
SFX Au 0 chalargachaku .
SFX Au 0 chalargachamikan .
SFX Au 0 chalargachamidi .
SFX Au 0 chalargachadirda .
SFX Au 0 deklarnimi .
SFX Au 0 deklarnichi .
SFX Au 0 deklarnidir .
SFX Au 0 deklarnida .
SFX Au 0 deklarniku .
SFX Au 0 deklarnimikan .
SFX Au 0 deklarnimidi .
SFX Au 0 deklarnidirda .
SFX Au 0 deklarningmi .
SFX Au 0 deklarningchi .
SFX Au 0 deklarningdir .
SFX Au 0 deklarningda .
SFX Au 0 deklarningku .
SFX Au 0 deklarningmikan .
SFX Au 0 deklarningmidi .
SFX Au 0 deklarningdirda .
SFX Au 0 deklardami .
SFX Au 0 deklardachi .
SFX Au 0 deklardadir .
SFX Au 0 deklardada .
SFX Au 0 deklardaku .
SFX Au 0 deklardamikan .
SFX Au 0 deklardamidi .
SFX Au 0 deklardadirda .
SFX Au 0 deklardanmi .
SFX Au 0 deklardanchi .
SFX Au 0 deklardandir .
SFX Au 0 deklardanda .
SFX Au 0 deklardanku .
SFX Au 0 deklardanmikan .
SFX Au 0 deklardanmidi .
SFX Au 0 deklardandirda .
SFX Au 0 deklardagimi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagichi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidir .
SFX Au 0 deklardagida .
SFX Au 0 deklardagiku .
SFX Au 0 deklardagimikan .
SFX Au 0 deklardagimidi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidirda .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekmi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekchi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekdir .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekda .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekku .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekmikan .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekmidi .
SFX Au 0 deklardagidekdirda .
SFX Au 0 deklargami .
SFX Au 0 deklargachi .
SFX Au 0 deklargadir .
SFX Au 0 deklargada .
SFX Au 0 deklargaku .
SFX Au 0 deklargamikan .
SFX Au 0 deklargamidi .
SFX Au 0 deklargadirda .
SFX Au 0 deklargachami .
SFX Au 0 deklargachachi .
SFX Au 0 deklargachadir .
SFX Au 0 deklargachada .
SFX Au 0 deklargachaku .
SFX Au 0 deklargachamikan .
SFX Au 0 deklargachamidi .
SFX Au 0 deklargachadirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnimi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnichi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnidir .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnida .
SFX Au 0 simonlarniku .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnimikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnimidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarnidirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningmi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningchi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningdir .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningda .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningku .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningmikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningmidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlarningdirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardami .
SFX Au 0 simonlardachi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardadir .
SFX Au 0 simonlardada .
SFX Au 0 simonlardaku .
SFX Au 0 simonlardamikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlardamidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardadirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanmi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanchi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardandir .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanku .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanmikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlardanmidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardandirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagimi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagichi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidir .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagida .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagiku .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagimikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagimidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekmi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekchi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekdir .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekda .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekku .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekmikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekmidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlardagidekdirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlargami .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachi .
SFX Au 0 simonlargadir .
SFX Au 0 simonlargada .
SFX Au 0 simonlargaku .
SFX Au 0 simonlargamikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlargamidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlargadirda .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachami .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachachi .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachadir .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachada .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachaku .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachamikan .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachamidi .
SFX Au 0 simonlargachadirda .
